Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 17. Big Black River Basin District

§§ 51-17-1 through 51-17-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-17-1 through §15-17-7. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5956-221 to 5956-224; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, §§ 1-4]

§51-17-9. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-225; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 271, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 295, § 1]

§51-17-11. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-226; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, § 6; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 38]

§ 51-17-13.
Preliminary expenses.

Any municipality or county which is within the territorial limits of the district may advance funds to the district to pay the preliminary expenses of the district, including engineer’s reports, organization, or administration expenses, on such terms of repayment as the governing body of such municipality or county shall determine. Notwithstanding the provision of any law to the contrary, any such municipality or county is authorized and empowered to borrow money for a period not to exceed one year from the date of such borrowing for the purpose of making such advances. The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized to repay any such advances from the monies of any funds possessed by the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-226; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1964).

§§ 51-17-15 and 51-17-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-17-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-227; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, § 7]

§51-17-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-228; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, § 8]

§§ 51-17-19 through 51-17-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-17-19 through §51-17-23. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5956-229 to 5956-231; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, §§ 9-11]

§51-17-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-232; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, § 12; Laws, 1988, ch. 473, § 15]

§51-17-27 through §51-17-35. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5956-233 to 5956-237; Laws, 1964, ch. 249, §§ 13-17]